de: Material des Waldhorn-Mundrohrs: Goldmessing; Neusilber; Sterlingsilber; Gelbmessing; Sonstiges
nl: Materiaal van mondpijp Franse hoorn: Goudmessing; Nieuwzilver; Sterling zilver; Geelmessing; Overige
hr-HR: Materijal usisne cijevi francuskog roga: Zlatna mjed; Novo srebro; Sterling srebro; Žuta mjed; Ostalo
nb: Munnrør-materiale i valthorn: Gullmessing; Nysølv; Sterlingsølv; Gul messing; Annet
lt-LT: Valtornos kandiklio vamzdžio medžiaga: Auksinis žalvaris; Naujasidabris; Didelio grynumo sidabras; Geltonasis žalvaris; Kita
pt-PT: Material do tubo de entrada da trompa francesa: Latão dourado; Alpaca; Prata de lei; Latão amarelo; Outro
en: French horn leadpipe material: Gold brass; Nickel silver; Sterling silver; Yellow brass; Other
ko: 프렌치 호른 리드파이프 소재: 골드 브라스; 니켈 실버; 스털링 실버; 옐로우 브라스; 기타
cs: Materiál náústku lesního rohu: Zlatá mosaz; Nové stříbro; Mincovní stříbro; Žlutá mosaz; Jiné
es: Material del tudel de la trompa: Latón dorado; Alpaca; Plata esterlina; Latón amarillo; Otro
sl-SI: Material ustnične cevi francoskega roga: Zlata medenina; Novo srebro; Srebro sterling; Rumena medenina; Drugo
th: วัสดุท่อลมของแตรเฟร้นช์ฮอร์น: โกลด์บราส; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; เงินสเตอร์ลิง; เยลโลว์บราส; อื่นๆ
sv: Material för valthornsrör: Guldmässing; Nysilver; Sterlingsilver; Gulmässing; Övrigt
ro-RO: Materialul tubului principal pentru corn francez: Alamă aurie; Alpacca; Argint masiv; Alamă galbenă; Altele
ru: Материал мундштучной трубки валторны: Золотая латунь; Нейзильбер; Стерлинговое серебро; Желтая латунь; Другое
pt-BR: Material do tubo de entrada da trompa: Latão ouro; Alpaca; Prata de lei; Latão amarelo; Outro
el: Υλικό κύριου σωλήνα γαλλικού κόρνου: Χρυσός ορείχαλκος; Νικέλιο-ασήμι (αλπακάς); Ασήμι sterling; Κίτρινος ορείχαλκος; Άλλο
tr: Korno ağız borusu malzemesi: Altın pirinç; Nikel gümüş; Som gümüş; Sarı pirinç; Diğer
sk-SK: Materiál náustku lesného rohu: Zlatá mosadz; Alpaka; Šterlingové striebro; Žltá mosadz; Iné
zh-TW: 法國號吹口管材質: 金銅; 白銅; 純銀; 黃銅; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на тръбата на валдхорна: Златен месинг; Алпака; Сребро проба 925; Жълт месинг; Друго
fi: Käyrätorven suukappaleen materiaali: Kultamessinki; Uushopea; Sterling-hopea; Keltamessinki; Muu
ja: フレンチホーンリードパイプ素材: ゴールドブラス; 洋白; スターリングシルバー; イエローブラス; その他
zh-CN: 圆号吹口管材质: 金黄铜; 白铜; 925 纯银; 黄铜; 其他
vi: Chất liệu ống dẫn hơi chính của kèn French horn: Đồng thau vàng sẫm; Bạc niken; Bạc sterling; Đồng thau vàng; Khác
hu: Francia kürt fúvókacső anyaga: Aranyréz; Alpakka; Sterling ezüst; Sárgaréz; Egyéb
it: Materiale del bocchino del corno francese: Ottone dorato; Alpacca; Argento sterling; Ottone giallo; Altro
da: Materiale i valdhornets mundrør: Guldmessing; Nysølv; Sterlingsølv; Gulmessing; Andet
fr: Matériau du tube d'embouchure du cor français: Laiton doré; Maillechort; Argent sterling; Laiton jaune; Autre
pl: Materiał rurki ustnikowej waltorni: Złoty mosiądz; Nowe srebro; Srebro wysokiej próby; Żółty mosiądz; Inny